Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.380

Dealers, cash buyers, livestock dealers—Recordkeeping—Carrying identification and health documents.

Every dealer or cash buyer purchasing any agricultural products from the consignor thereof shall promptly make and keep for three years a correct record showing in detail the following:

(1) The name and address of the consignor.

(2) The date received.

(3) The terms of the sale.

(4) The quality and quantity delivered by the consignor, and where applicable the dockage, tare, grade, size, net weight, or quantity.

(5) An itemized statement of any charges paid by the dealer or cash buyer for the account of the consignor.

(6) The name and address of the purchaser: PROVIDED, That the name and address of the purchaser may be deleted from the record furnished to the consignor.

A copy of such record containing the above matters shall be forwarded to the consignor forthwith.

Livestock dealers must also maintain individual animal identification and disposition records as may be required by law, or rule adopted by the director.

Livestock dealers must carry animal identification and animal health documents as required by chapters 16.36 and 16.57 RCW and rules adopted by the director under those chapters.

[ 2007 c 71 s 7; 1991 c 109 s 21; 1989 c 354 s 42; 1988 c 254 s 17; 1981 c 296 s 33; 1963 c 232 s 4; 1959 c 139 s 38.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.